Rhode Island, session 2025, SB540.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-15 of the General Laws entitled "Passing, Use of Lanes, and Rules
of the Road" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-15-1.1. Lane filtering for motorcycles -- definition.
(a) The operator of a two (2)-wheeled motorcycle may engage in lane filtering when:
(1) The operator of a two (2) wheeled motorcycle is on a road with lanes wide enough to
pass safely;
(2) The overtaking motorcycle is not operated at a speed in excess of twenty miles per hour
(20 mph) when overtaking the stopped or slow-moving vehicle; and
(3) Conditions permit continued reasonable and prudent operation of the motorcycle while
lane filtering.
(b) As used in this section, "lane filtering" means the act of overtaking and passing another
vehicle that is stopped or traveling at a speed not in excess of ten miles per hour (10 mph) in the
same direction of travel and in the same lane.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001526
========